Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.210

Application—Contents.

An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application providing the following information concerning the applicant's qualifications as a voter in this state:

(1) The applicant's full name;

(2) The applicant's date of birth;

(3) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;

(4) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the same as the address in subsection (3) of this section;

(5) The gender of the applicant;

(6) The former address of the applicant if previously registered to vote;

(7) The applicant's Washington state driver's license number, Washington state identification card number, or the last four digits of the applicant's social security number if the applicant does not have a Washington state driver's license or Washington state identification card;

(8) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate membership in the armed forces, national guard, or reserves, or overseas voter status;

(9) Clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw the applicant's attention, stating that:

(a) The applicant must be a United States citizen in order to register to vote; and

(b) The applicant may register to vote if the applicant is at least sixteen years old and may vote if the applicant will be at least eighteen years old by the next general election, or is at least eighteen years old for special elections;

(10) A check box and declaration confirming that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;

(11) The following warning:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both."

(12) The oath required by RCW 29A.08.230 and a space for the applicant's signatures. The secretary of state is encouraged to provide applications for voter registration with multiple signature blocks to assist in comparing signatures on ballot declarations; and

(13) Any other information that the secretary of state determines is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.

This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to be prescribed by the secretary of state.

[ 2024 c 269 s 11; (2024 c 269 s 10 expired July 15, 2024); 2023 c 466 s 6; 2020 c 208 s 3; 2018 c 109 s 8; 2009 c 369 s 16; 2005 c 246 s 11; 2003 c 111 s 216; 1994 c 57 s 11; 1990 c 143 s 7; 1973 1st ex.s. c 21 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 9; 1965 c 9 s 29.07.070. Prior: 1947 c 68 s 3, part; 1933 c 1 s 11, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 5114-11, part; prior: 1921 c 177 s 7, part; 1915 c 16 s 8, part; 1901 c 135 s 4, part; 1893 c 45 s 3, part; 1889 p 416 s 8, part; RRS s 5126, part. Formerly RCW 29.07.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 269 s 11: "Section 11 of this act takes effect July 15, 2024." [ 2024 c 269 s 16.]

Expiration date—2024 c 269 s 10: "Section 10 of this act expires July 15, 2024." [ 2024 c 269 s 15.]

Effective date—2023 c 466 ss 3, 4, 6, 11, 13-16, and 20-23: See note following RCW 29A.08.030.

Effective date—2020 c 208 ss 3, 5, 6, and 13-17: "Sections 3, 5, 6, and 13 through 17 of this act take effect January 1, 2022." [ 2020 c 208 s 24.]

Short title—2020 c 208: "This act may be known and cited as the voting opportunities through education act or the VOTE act." [ 2020 c 208 s 1.]

Findings—2020 c 208: "The legislature finds that robust participation by young voters in Washington state elections is critical to ensuring lifelong civic engagement. Research has shown that voting is a habitual behavior and that people who vote in the first three elections when they are eligible will likely vote for life. However, this is also the period of time when they are likely to face unique barriers to participate in the democratic process, including regularly changing their address, becoming eligible shortly after an election, and exclusion from certain voter registration policies.

The legislature also finds that the period prior to election day is the most critical time to ensure ballot access for young voters. States with early voting have higher participation rates than states that do not and the use of early voting sites on college campuses helped produce record levels of participation for young voters in 2016 and 2018.

The legislature finds that students that have more opportunities to be registered and vote are more likely to participate. Limiting statutory voter registration opportunities on college campuses to days well in advance of election day is inconsistent with implementation of same-day voter registration. Making automatic voter registration unavailable to those registering for the first time denies young voters the same benefits as every other voter." [ 2020 c 208 s 2.]

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1990 c 143 ss 1-8: See note following RCW 29A.08.340.

Civil disabilities of wife abolished: RCW 26.16.160.

Civil rights

loss of: State Constitution Art. 6 s 3, RCW 29A.08.520.

restoration of: RCW 9.92.066, 9.94A.637, 9.94A.885, 9.95.260, chapter 9.96 RCW.

Copy of instrument restoring civil rights as evidence: RCW 5.44.090.

Qualifications of electors: State Constitution Art. 6 s 1 (Amendment 5).

Residence defined: RCW 29A.04.151.